Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 2 Organization and Personnel of Department of Banking and Finance

7-1-30.
Department created.

There is created the Department of Banking and Finance.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-301; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1101; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1198, § 2.

7-1-31.
Position and term of commissioner.

The head of the department shall be the commissioner who shall exercise supervision and control over all divisions and employees of the department.

The commissioner shall be appointed by the Governor, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, for a four-year term. The initial term of the commissioner shall terminate on January 20, 1976. Each succeeding term of office shall be for four years commencing on the expiration date of the previous term. Beginning July 1, 1999, the salary of the commissioner shall be set by the Governor.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, § 2; Code 1933, § 13-302; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, §§ 1101, 1102; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1198, §§ 2, 3; Code 1933, § 41A-201, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 910, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 1213, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 1999, p. 910, § 1, was superseded by the amendment by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1213, § 1.

7-1-32.
Qualifications of commissioner.

The commissioner shall be of good moral character, shall not have been convicted in any court of competent jurisdiction of any crime involving moral turpitude, shall have been a citizen of this state for not less than three years, and shall have attained the age of 30 years but be less than 70 years. In addition, the commissioner shall have had at least five years’ experience as an active officer of a bank or national bank or as an examiner or other officer in a federal or state agency supervising such institutions.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, § 4; Code 1933, § 13-304; Code 1933, § 40-3597, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1102; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1198, § 3; Code 1933, § 41A-202, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-33.
Removal or suspension of commissioner.

The commissioner may be suspended or removed by the Governor whenever the Governor has in his judgment trustworthy information that the commissioner is insane or has absconded or grossly neglected his duties or is guilty of conduct plainly violative of his duties or the restrictions of Code Section 7-1-37.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, § 7; Code 1933, § 13-307; Code 1933, § 41A-203, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-34.
Vacancy in office of commissioner.

In the event there shall be a vacancy in the office caused by death, resignation, disability, disqualification, suspension, or removal of the commissioner, the senior deputy commissioner of banking and finance previously designated by the commissioner as provided in Code Section 7-1-35 shall exercise the powers and perform the duties of the commissioner until a successor is appointed and qualified to serve for the unexpired term of the commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, § 3; Code 1933, § 13-303; Code 1933, § 41A-204, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 2.

7-1-35.
Deputy commissioners, examiners, and assistants.

The commissioner shall appoint from time to time, with the right to discharge at will, a senior deputy commissioner of banking and finance. The commissioner may appoint additional deputy commissioners as needed. All deputy commissioners shall also be ex officio examiners. The commissioner may appoint such additional examiners and assistants as he or she may need to discharge in a proper manner the duties imposed upon the commissioner by law, subject to any applicable state laws or rules or regulations and within the limitations of the appropriation to the department as prescribed in this chapter. Hiring, promotion, and other personnel policies of the department shall be consistent with guidelines or directives of the state, shall be in writing, and shall be made available upon request to employees of the department.

Within the limitations of its annual appropriation, the department may expend funds pursuant to the authority granted under Article VIII, Section VII, Paragraph I of the 1983 Constitution of Georgia necessary to the recruitment, training, and certification of a professional staff of financial examiners. The department may provide for the participation of examiners in such educational, training, and certification programs as the commissioner deems necessary to the continued qualification and recognition of the professional status of examiners. The department may recognize independent certification of professional qualifications as supplemental to the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board in considering the personnel actions relative to its examiners.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, §§ 10, 12; Ga. L. 1920, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1922, p. 63, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 13-310, 13-312; Ga. L. 1943, p. 257, § 1; Ga. L. 1945, p. 403, § 1; Ga. L. 1947, p. 673, § 1a; Ga. L. 1949, p. 526, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 540, § 3; Code 1933, § 41A-205, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 458, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 3; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 3/SB 82; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-3/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

7-1-36.
Oath of commissioner, deputy commissioner, and examiners.

Before entering office, the commissioner shall take an oath before the Governor or one of the Justices of the Supreme Court to support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Georgia and to execute faithfully the duties of his or her office, which oath shall be in writing and subscribed to by the commissioner and filed in the Governor’s office. Before entering their respective offices, each deputy commissioner and examiner shall take an oath of office before the commissioner to support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Georgia and to execute faithfully the duties of their respective offices which shall be in writing and subscribed by the deputy commissioner or examiner and filed with the department.

The commissioner, each deputy commissioner, and each examiner shall:

Faithfully discharge, execute, and perform all and singular the duties required of such officer and which may be required by the Constitution and laws of the State of Georgia;

Faithfully account for all moneys that may be received by such officer from time to time by virtue of his office; and

Safely deliver to the successor of such office all books, moneys, vouchers, accounts, and effects whatever belonging to said office.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, §§ 6, 11; Code 1933, §§ 13-306, 13-311; Code 1933, § 41A-206, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 7; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 3; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 1-1/HB 811; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 7/HB 323.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2016, a period was added following “Governor’s office” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (a).

7-1-37.
Restrictions on commissioner, deputy commissioners, and examiners.

Except as provided in subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this Code section, the commissioner, any deputy commissioner, any department employee with financial institution or licensee supervisory responsibilities, or any examiner employed by the department shall not directly or indirectly:

Receive any money or property as a loan from or become indebted to any financial institution or from or to any director, officer, agent, employee, attorney, or subsidiary of a financial institution, unless such employee does not examine or exercise supervisory responsibility over any financial institution;

Receive any money or property as a gift from any financial institution or from any director, officer, agent, employee, attorney, or subsidiary of a financial institution, unless consistent with the ethics in government policy of this state;

Give any money or property as a gift to any financial institution or to any director, officer, agent, employee, attorney, or subsidiary of a financial institution, unless consistent with the ethics in government policy of this state;

Own any share in or securities of a financial institution or otherwise have an ownership interest in a financial institution; or

Engage in the business of a financial institution.

For purposes of this Code section and subject to subsection (c) of this Code section, the term “financial institution” shall include a bank holding company and any subsidiary of a bank holding company.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, the commissioner, any deputy commissioner, any department employee with financial institution or licensee supervisory responsibilities, or examiners employed by the department may borrow money from and otherwise deal with any financial institution or subsidiary thereof existing under the laws of the United States or of any state other than this state, provided that the obligee financial institution or subsidiary is not examined or regulated by the department. For the purposes of this subsection, a financial institution shall not be considered regulated solely because it is required to file an exemption from licensing under Code Section 7-1-1001 or solely because it is owned or controlled by another bank or corporation which is or may be examined or regulated by the department.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit the commissioner, any deputy commissioner, any department employee with financial institution or licensee supervisory responsibilities, or any examiner of the department from maintaining a deposit in any financial institution, purchasing banking services other than credit services, or owning a single share in a credit union in the ordinary course of business and under rates and terms generally available to other customers of the financial institution. The provisions of this Code section shall not be applicable in the cases of a lender credit card obligation to a financial institution where the maximum outstanding credit does not exceed $25,000.00 nor to any other credit obligation fully secured by the pledge of a deposit account in the lending institution, provided that the financial institution is not within the employee’s assigned examination authority and provided that the rates and terms of all such obligations are not preferential in comparison to similar obligations of the financial institution’s other customers. Such exempt obligations shall be reported to the commissioner within ten days of execution of the credit obligation if the financial institution is regulated or examined by the department, and the employee shall be disqualified from any dealings with the obligee financial institution.

The commissioner, a deputy commissioner, a department employee with financial institution or licensee supervisory responsibilities, or an examiner of the department may be permitted to own securities of a financial institution under any of the following circumstances:

A deputy commissioner, a department employee with financial institution or licensee supervisory responsibilities, or an examiner of the department may own such a security if the security was obtained prior to commencement of employment with the department;

A deputy commissioner, a department employee with financial institution or licensee supervisory responsibilities, or an examiner of the department may own such a security if the ownership of the security was acquired through inheritance; gift; stock split or dividend; merger, acquisition, or other change in corporate structure; or otherwise without specific intent on the part of the employee to acquire the interest; and

The commissioner, a deputy commissioner, a department employee with financial institution or licensee supervisory responsibilities, or an examiner of the department may own such a security if the security is part of an investment fund, provided that, upon initial or subsequent investment by the employee, excluding ordinary dividend reinvestment, the fund does not have invested, or indicate in its prospectus the intent to invest, more than 30 percent of its assets in the securities of one or more Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation insured depository institutions or Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation insured depository institution holding companies and the employee neither exercises control nor has the ability to exercise control over the financial interests held in the fund.

In the case of permissible acquisitions pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the employee shall make a full, written disclosure to the commissioner within 30 days of beginning employment or acquiring the interest. The employee is disqualified from participating in or sharing information regarding any matter or activity that concerns the financial institution. Such disqualification must not, in the judgment of the commissioner, unduly interfere with the employee’s duties.

In the event any covered person inadvertently and without intent on his or her part acquires an interest in a security that is not allowed by this subsection, such security shall be disposed of within 90 days of acquisition.

No examiner, which for the purposes of this Code section shall include a supervisor as defined by the department, may examine a financial institution to which he or she is indebted or of which he or she owns securities under the exceptions in subparagraphs (e)(1)(A) and (e)(1)(B) of this Code section, nor may an examiner obtain credit from a financial institution if he or she has examined such financial institution in the preceding 12 months. An examiner who wishes to borrow funds from any financial institution he or she has examined in the past five years must first obtain the written permission of the commissioner. This subsection is included as an additional precaution and is not intended to preclude the operation of any other applicable law or regulation.

The commissioner, any deputy commissioner, any department employee with financial institution or licensee supervisory responsibility, or any examiner shall not directly or indirectly:

Receive any money or property as a loan from any department licensee or any director, officer, agent, employee, or attorney of a department licensee, unless such employee does not examine or exercise supervisory responsibility over that licensee;

Receive any money or property as a gift from any department licensee or any director, officer, agent, employee, or attorney of a department licensee, unless consistent with the ethics in government policy of this state;

Give any money or property as a gift to any department licensee or any director, officer, agent, employee, or attorney of a department licensee, unless consistent with the ethics in government policy of this state; or

Engage in the business of a department licensee.

No director, officer, agent, employee, or attorney of a financial institution, individually or in his or her official capacity, shall knowingly participate in a violation of this Code section. However, nothing in this Code section shall restrict the right of the commissioner, any deputy commissioner, any department employee with financial institution or licensee supervisory responsibilities, or any examiner to deal as any other consumer with such director, officer, agent, employee, or attorney in the ordinary course of business in consumer areas of trade or commerce not regulated by the department and under terms and conditions which are not preferential.

The commissioner, any deputy commissioner, any department employee with financial institution or licensee supervisory responsibilities, or any examiner employed by the department who shall violate or participate in a violation of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Violation of this Code section shall be grounds for removal from office.

The commissioner may adopt additional supplementary administrative policies and departmental rules governing ethical conduct and conflicts of interest on the part of employees of the department and providing certain definitions and clarifications to effectuate the purposes of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, §§ 4, 10; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 20, § 6; Code 1933, §§ 13-304, 13-310, 13-9906; Code 1933, §§ 41A-207, 41A-9904, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 919, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 532, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 7; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 4; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1220, § 2; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 2/HB 185; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 1/HB 891.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added “, unless such employee does not examine or exercise supervisory responsibility over any financial institution” at the end of paragraph (a)(1); and inserted a comma following “attorney” in paragraph (a)(3).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided that the obligee” for “provided the obligee” in the middle of the first sentence of subsection (c).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted the former last two sentences of subsection (c), which read: “All extensions of credit, including but not limited to such permitted loans, which obligate the commissioner or any deputy commissioner to such a financial institution or subsidiary, directly or contingently by way of guaranty, endorsement, or otherwise, or which renew or modify existing obligations shall be reported by the individual concerned to the Attorney General in writing, within ten days after the execution thereof, showing the nature of the undertaking and the amount and terms of the loan or other transaction. All credit obligations of a similar nature to those set forth above on the part of any other department employee with financial institution or licensee supervisory responsibilities or examiner shall be reported to the commissioner within ten days after the execution thereof.”; in subsection (d), substituted “does not exceed $25,000.00” for “may not exceed $10,000.00” and “provided that the rates” for “provided the rates” in the second sentence, and substituted “shall be reported to the commissioner within ten days of execution of the credit obligation if the financial institution is regulated or examined by the department,” for “shall, however, be reported as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section,” in the third sentence; and deleted the former last two sentences of paragraph (g)(1), which read: “Any debt owed by a deputy commissioner, department employee with financial institution or licensee supervisory responsibility, or examiner of a department licensee must be reported to the commissioner. Reporting by the commissioner shall be made to the Attorney General”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “of this Code section” was added following “subsection (c)” in the last sentence of subsection (d).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, a comma was added following “licensee supervisory responsibilities” near the beginning of subparagraph (e)(1)(C).

7-1-38.
Commissioner’s office expenses.

The commissioner shall be provided with suitable offices and equipment, the expense of which shall be paid by the state in the same manner as the expenses of other offices of the state government are paid.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, § 8; Ga. L. 1920, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1925, p. 119, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-308; Ga. L. 1963, p. 369, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-208, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-39.
Seal of department; evidentiary effect.

The department shall adopt an official seal. Any paper executed under the seal of the department shall prima facie be deemed to have been executed by a duly authorized official of the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-209, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-40.
Delegation of authority by commissioner.

Any authority, power, or duty vested in the commissioner or department by a provision of this chapter may be exercised, discharged, or performed by a deputy, assistant, examiner, or employee of the department acting in the commissioner’s name and by his delegated authority. In the case of any matters involving the exercise of discretion, the delegation of authority shall be in writing. Any such delegation by the commissioner may be revoked in the same manner in which it was granted.

The commissioner shall be responsible for the official acts of such persons who act in his name and by his authority.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-324, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 526, § 2; Code 1933, § 41A-210, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-41.
Prescribing fees; payment procedure.

The department may, by regulation, prescribe annual examination fees, license fees, registration fees, and supervision fees to be paid by the institutions and entities assigned to the department by this title for regulation, supervision, licensure, or registration. In addition, the department may, by regulation, prescribe reasonable application and related fees, special investigation fees, hearing fees, mortgage loan fees, and fees to provide copies of any book, account, report, or other paper filed in its office or for any certification thereof or for processing any papers as required by this title. Such fees may vary by type of institution regulated and nature of the work performed.

The department, in its discretion, may require the payment of such fees in any manner deemed to be efficient, including collection through automated clearing-house arrangements or other electronic means, so that the state receives funds no later than the date the payment is required to be made.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-212, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1220, § 3.

7-1-42.
Enforcement of payment.

In the event any financial institution shall fail or refuse to pay on demand any amount owed to the department, including, but not limited to, outstanding fees, the department may proceed through the Attorney General to collect the same by action at law.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 3, § 6; Code 1933, § 13-406; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, § 23; Code 1933, § 41A-213, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 1-2/HB 811.

7-1-43.
Disposition of fees collected; payment of expenses from appropriations.

Fees prescribed by this chapter shall be collected by the department and deposited with the Office of the State Treasurer. The department may, at its discretion, remit such amounts net of the cost of recovery, which cost may include fees paid to a collection agency or attorney for recovery of moneys due the department. All of the expenses incurred in connection with the conduct of the business of the department shall be paid out of the appropriations of funds to the department by the General Assembly. Such expenses shall include all expenses incurred as travel expenses by personnel of the department when away from their official station as assigned by the commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, §§ 13, 14; Code 1933, § 13-313; Code 1933, § 13-305, enacted by Ga. L. 1965, p. 540, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-211, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 5; Ga. L. 2003, p. 843, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.